Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-603
Over-insurance; penalties.

Every insurer who makes insurance upon any building or property or interest therein against loss or damage by fire, and every agent who issues a fire insurance policy covering any building or property or interest therein, and every insured who procures a policy of fire insurance upon any building or property or interest therein owned by him, is presumed to know the insurable value of such building or property or interest therein at the time such insurance is effected. Any insurer who knowingly makes insurance on any building or property or interest therein against loss or damage by fire in excess of the insurable value thereof, shall be fined in a sum not less than fifty dollars nor more than one hundred dollars. Any agent who knowingly effects insurance on a building or property or interest therein in excess of the insurable value thereof shall be fined in a sum not less than fifteen nor more than twenty-five dollars.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 111, p. 454;

R.S.1913, § 3248;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. VIII, § 3, p. 635;

C.S.1922, § 7847;

C.S.1929, § 44-703;

R.S.1943, § 44-603.